Utah statutes.
35A-2-101.   Economic service areas -- Creation.

(1) (a)  The executive director shall establish economic service areas to furnish the services described in Section 35A-2-201.

(b)  In establishing economic service areas, the executive director shall seek input from:

(i)  state and local government agencies and departments;

(ii)  the groups representing public employees;

(iii)  employers, business, education, and other entities affected by the structure of the economic service areas; and

(iv)  the general public.

(2)  In establishing the economic service areas, the executive director shall consider:

(a)  areas comprised of multiple counties;

(b)  the alignment of transportation and other infrastructure or services;

(c)  the interdependence of the economy within a geographic area;

(d)  the ability to develop regional marketing and economic development programs;

(e)  the labor market areas;

(f)  the population of the area, as established in the most recent estimate by the Utah Population Estimates Committee;

(g)  the number of individuals in the previous year receiving:

(i)  services under Chapter 3, Employment Support Act; and

(ii)  benefits under Chapter 4, Employment Security Act; and

(h)  other factors that relate to the management of the programs administered or that relate to the delivery of services provided under this title.

